Arkansas, session 2025, HB1514.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 21-4-203(7)(A), concerning definitions to
be used under the Uniform Attendance and Leave Policy Act, is amended to read
as follows:
(7)(A) “Critical-need employee” means a person employed by any
of the following state agencies in a position or classification that is
required to be staffed by the state agency twenty-four (24) hours a day and
seven (7) days a week:
(i) The Department of Corrections;
(ii) The Department of Health;
(iii) The Department of Human Services;
(iv) The Division of Emergency Management;
(v) The Division of Arkansas State Police;
(vi) The Department of Veterans Affairs; or
(vii) The Department of Agriculture; or
(viii) The Department of the Military.
*ZRC018*
02/18/2025 9:20:45 AM ZRC018